sv: Konstruktionstyp för pickleball: Skum; Rotationsgjuten i ett stycke; Sömlös i ett stycke; Svetsad i två stycken; Övrigt
pl: Rodzaj wykonania piłki do pickleballa: Pianka; Formowana rotacyjnie, jednoczęściowa; Bezszwowa, jednoczęściowa; Zgrzewana, dwuczęściowa; Inna
ko: 피클볼 구조 유형: 폼; 로토몰딩 원피스; 심리스 원피스; 웰딩 투피스; 기타
tr: Pickleball yapı türü: Köpük; Döndürerek kalıplanmış tek parça; Eksiz tek parça; Kaynaklı iki parça; Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta konstrukcije pickleball reketa: Pjena; Rotacijski lijevano jednodijelno; Bešavno jednodijelno; Zavareno dvodijelno; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tip de construcție a paletei/mingii de pickleball: Spumă; Turnată dintr-o singură bucată (rotomolding); Dintr-o bucată fără cusături; Din două bucăți sudate; Altele
pt-BR: Pickleball, tipo de construção: Espuma; Peça única rotomoldada; Peça única sem costura; Duas peças soldadas; Outros
da: Konstruktionstype for pickleball: Skum; Rotationsstøbt i ét stykke; Sømløs i ét stykke; Svejset i to stykker; Andet
fi: Pickleball-pallon rakennetyyppi: Vaahtomuovi; Rotaatiovalettu, yksiosainen; Saumaton, yksiosainen; Hitsattu, kaksiosainen; Muu
fr: Type de construction pour le pickleball: Mousse; Moulé par rotation en une pièce; En une pièce sans soudure; Soudé en deux pièces; Autre
nl: Pickleball-constructietype: Schuim; Rotatiegegoten uit één stuk; Naadloos uit één stuk; Gelast uit twee stukken; Overige
th: ประเภทการผลิตลูกบอลพิคเคิลบอล: โฟม; ชิ้นเดียวขึ้นรูปด้วยการหมุน; ชิ้นเดียวแบบไร้รอยต่อ; สองชิ้นเชื่อมต่อกัน; อื่นๆ
nb: Konstruksjonstype for pickleball: Skum; Rotasjonsstøpt, i ett stykke; Sømløs, i ett stykke; Sveiset, to stykker; Annet
el: Τύπος κατασκευής pickleball: Αφρός; Μονοκόμματο περιστροφικής χύτευσης; Μονοκόμματο χωρίς ραφές; Συγκολλημένο δύο τεμαχίων; Άλλο
it: Tipo di costruzione del pickleball: Schiuma; Monopezzo in rotazionale; Monopezzo senza cuciture; Due pezzi saldati; Altro
zh-CN: 匹克球结构类型: 泡沫; 滚塑一体式; 无缝一体式; 焊接两件式; 其他
bg-BG: Тип конструкция за пикълбол: Пяна; Ротационно формована, от една част; Безшевна, от една част; Заварена, от две части; Друг
es: Tipo de construcción de la pelota de pickleball: Espuma; Rotomoldeado de una pieza; Sin costuras de una pieza; Soldado de dos piezas; Otro
de: Bauart des Pickleballs: Schaumstoff; Rotationsgeformt, einteilig; Nahtlos, einteilig; Geschweißt, zweiteilig; Andere
en: Pickleball construction type: Foam; Rotomolded one-piece; Seamless one-piece; Welded two-piece; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta izdelave pickleball žogice/loparja: Pena; Rotacijsko vlivanje (enodelno); Brezšivno (enodelno); Varjeno (dvodelno); Drugo
sk-SK: Typ konštrukcie pickleballu: Penová; Rotačne tvarovaná jednodielna; Bezšvová jednodielna; Zváraná dvojdielna; Iné
cs: Typ konstrukce hřiště na pickleball: Pěna; Odlévané z jednoho kusu (rotomolding); Bezešvé z jednoho kusu; Svařované ze dvou kusů; Ostatní
ru: Тип конструкции пиклбола: Пена; Цельный (ротационное формование); Бесшовный цельный; Сварной из двух частей; Другое
ja: ピックルボール構造タイプ: フォーム; 回転成形ワンピース; シームレスワンピース; 溶接ツーピース; その他
lt-LT: Piklbolo konstrukcijos tipas: Porolonas; Sukamojo formavimo, vientisas; Besiūlis, vientisas; Suvirintas, dviejų dalių; Kita
vi: Kiểu cấu trúc bóng pickleball: Xốp; Đúc quay một khối; Nguyên khối liền mạch; Hai khối hàn; Khác
zh-TW: 匹克球結構類型: 泡棉; 一體成型旋轉成型; 一體成型無縫; 兩件式焊接; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de fabrico da bola de pickleball: Espuma; Peça única rotomoldada; Peça única sem costuras; Duas peças soldadas; Outro
hu: Pickleball kialakítás típusa: Habszivacs; Egyrészes, rotációs öntésű; Egyrészes, varratmentes; Hegesztett, kétrészes; Egyéb